California statutes. Business and Professions Code
No city, county, or city and county may grant, or permit to continue in effect, a license to deal, operate, carry on, conduct, maintain, or expose for play any controlled game to any applicant or holder of a local license unless the applicant or local licensee is an owner licensee as defined in this chapter. However, the issuance of a state gambling license to a person imposes no requirements upon the city, county, or city and county to issue a license to the person.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19951 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 114.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19965.

Notwithstanding Sections 19961 and 19962, a city, county, or city and county may amend an ordinance to increase the number of gambling tables that may be operated in a gambling establishment as follows:

(a) If the ordinance in effect on July 1, 2007, provided for five to eight tables, inclusive, the amended ordinance may allow an increase of three tables.

(b) If the ordinance in effect on July 1, 2007, provided for nine to 12 tables, inclusive, the amended ordinance may allow an increase of four tables.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 647, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19966.

If a gambling establishment is located in an unincorporated area annexed by a city, notwithstanding Section 19960 or 19962, without a local election other than the election to approve the annexation, the city acquiring jurisdiction may adopt an ordinance permitting and regulating controlled gaming in the existing gambling establishment, providing hours of operation, the games to be played, wagering limits, the maximum number of gambling establishments, and the maximum number of tables permitted in each gambling establishment, the same as those limits in any ordinance or resolutions that formerly applied to the gambling establishment. Where this article refers to an expansion of gaming as compared to that permitted on January 1, 1996, for the purposes of this section, that reference shall be to the ordinance or resolutions that
 governed the gambling establishment as of that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 233, Sec. 21.   (AB 293)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Miscellaneous Provisions [19970. - 19972.]

19970.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, or part of this chapter, for any reason, is adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder of this chapter and the application thereof to other persons or circumstances, but shall be confined to the operation of the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment was rendered and to the person or circumstances involved.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19956 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19971.

This act is an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the State of California, and shall be liberally construed to effectuate those purposes.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19957 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 118.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19972.

For the purposes of Section 3482 of the Civil Code, the issuance of a state gambling license shall not be construed to authorize any conduct or activity other than the conduct of controlled gambling.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19958 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 119.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Additional Restrictions Related to Fair Elections and Corruption of Regulators [19980. - 19983.]

19980.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that there is a compelling governmental interest in ensuring that elections conducted pursuant to Section 19960 are conducted fairly and that electors in those elections are presented with fair and balanced arguments in support of and in opposition to the existence of gambling establishments. Large contributions by gambling operators or prospective gambling operators who will be financially interested in the outcome of the election often unfairly distort the context in which those elections take place.

(b) In California, in other states, and in other countries, there is ample historical evidence of the potential for revenues derived from gambling to be used to corrupt political officials in the regulation or prosecution of crimes related to gambling activities, embezzlement, and money laundering.

(c) This article is an exercise of the police power of the state for the protection of the health, safety, and welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19959 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19981.

(a) A member of the commission, the executive director, the chief, and any employee of the commission or department designated by regulation, shall not, for a period of three years after leaving office or terminating employment, for compensation, act as agent or attorney for, or otherwise represent, any other person by making any formal or informal appearance, or by making any oral or written communication, before the commission or the department, or any officer or employee thereof, if the appearance or communication is for the purpose of influencing administrative action, or influencing any action or proceeding involving the issuance, amendment, awarding, or revocation of a permit, license, or approval.

(b) A member of the commission shall not solicit or accept campaign contributions from any person, including any applicant or licensee.

(c) A member of the commission, the executive director, the chief, any employee of the commission, and any employee of the department who works on or supervises over gambling issues shall not, for a period of two years after leaving office or terminating employment, hold a direct or indirect interest in, hold employment with, represent, appear for, or negotiate on behalf of, a gambling establishment,
 gambling enterprise, registrant, or licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 666)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19982.

(a) A license may be denied, suspended, or revoked if the applicant or licensee, within three years prior to the submission of the license or renewal application, or any time thereafter, violates any law or ordinance with respect to campaign finance disclosure or contribution limitations applicable to an election that is conducted pursuant to Section 19960, former Section 19950, or pursuant to former Section 19819, as that section read immediately prior to its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter.

(1) The remedies specified herein are in addition to any other remedy or penalty provided by law.

(2) Any final determination by the Fair Political Practices Commission that the applicant did not violate any provision of state law within its jurisdiction shall be binding on the commission.

(3) Any final determination by a city or county governmental body having ultimate jurisdiction over the matter that the applicant did not violate an ordinance with respect to campaign finance disclosure or contribution limitations applicable to an election conducted pursuant to Section 19960, former Section 19950, or former Section 19819, as that section read immediately prior to its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter, shall be binding on the commission.

(b) Every applicant for a gambling license, or any renewal thereof, shall file with the department, at the time the license application or renewal is filed, the following information:

(1) Any statement or other document required to be filed with the Fair Political Practices Commission relative to an election that is conducted pursuant to Section 19960, former Section 19950, or former Section 19819, as that section read immediately prior to its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter, within three years of the date on which the application is submitted.

(2) Any statement or other document required to be filed with any local jurisdiction respecting campaign finance disclosure or contribution limitations applicable to an election that is conducted pursuant to Section 19960, former Section 19950, or former Section 19819, as that section read immediately prior to its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter, within three years of the date on which the application is submitted.

(3) A report of any contribution of money or thing of value, in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), made to any committee, as defined by Section 82013 of the Government Code, associated with any election that is conducted pursuant to Section 19960, former Section 19950, or former Section 19819, as that section read immediately prior to its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter, within three years of the date on which the application is submitted.

(4) A report of any other significant involvement by the applicant or licensee in an election that is conducted pursuant to Section 19960, former Section 19950, or former Section 19819, as that section read immediately prior to its repeal by the act that enacted this chapter, within three years of the date on which the application is submitted.

(c) The commission shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 47.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19983.

It is the intent of the Legislature that if any provision of this article is adjudged by a court to be invalid because of any conflict or inconsistency with the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code), as amended, that judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate any other provision of this chapter and the application thereof to other persons or circumstances, but shall be confined to the operation of the clause, sentence, paragraph, or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment was rendered and to the person or circumstances involved.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 19960.4 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 738, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Additional Contracts: Proposition Players [19984. - 19984.]

19984.

Notwithstanding any other law, a licensed gambling enterprise may contract with a third party for the purpose of providing proposition player services at a gambling establishment, subject to the following conditions:

(a) Any agreement, contract, or arrangement between a gambling enterprise and a third-party provider of proposition player services shall be approved in advance by the department, and in no event shall a gambling enterprise or the house have any interest, whether direct or indirect, in funds wagered, lost, or won.

(b) (1) The commission shall establish reasonable criteria for,
 and require the licensure and registration of, any person or entity that provides proposition player services at gambling establishments pursuant to this section, including owners, supervisors, and players. The commission may impose licensing requirements, disclosures, approvals, conditions, or limitations as it deems necessary to protect the integrity of controlled gambling in this state, and may assess, and the department may collect, reasonable fees and deposits as necessary to defray the costs of providing this regulation and oversight.

(2) A person who owns or is employed by a third-party provider of proposition player services, including, but not limited to, an owner, supervisor, observer, or player, shall wear a badge that clearly identifies them as providing proposition player services, in a location that allows for public view, at all times while in a gambling establishment for which their third-party proposition player services company has a current contract.

(c) The department, pursuant to regulations of the commission, is empowered to perform background checks, financial audits, and other investigatory services as needed to assist the commission in regulating third-party providers of proposition player services, and may assess and collect reasonable fees and deposits as necessary to defray the costs of providing this regulation and oversight. The department may adopt emergency
 regulations in order to implement this subdivision.

(d) No agreement or contract between a licensed gambling enterprise and a third party concerning the provision of proposition player services shall be invalidated or prohibited by the department pursuant to this section until the commission establishes criteria for, and makes determinations regarding the licensure or registration of, the provision of these services pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 553, Sec. 5.   (SB 819)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Nonprofit Organization Fundraisers [19985. - 19987.]

19985.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Nonprofit organizations provide important and necessary services to the people of the State of California with respect to educational and social services and there is a need to provide methods of fundraising to nonprofit organizations so as to enable them to meet their stated purposes.

(b) The playing of controlled games for the purpose of raising funds by nonprofit organizations is in the public interest.

(c) Uniform regulation for the conduct of controlled games is in the best interests of nonprofit organizations and the people of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 707, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19986.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law a nonprofit organization may conduct a fundraiser using controlled games as a funding mechanism to further the purposes and mission of the nonprofit organization.

(b) A nonprofit organization holding a fundraiser pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not conduct more than one fundraiser per calendar year, and each fundraiser shall not exceed five consecutive hours. Each fundraiser shall be preapproved by the department. Eligible nonprofit organizations that have multiple chapters may hold one fundraiser per chapter per calendar year.

(c) No cash prizes or wagers may be awarded to participants, however, the winner of each controlled game may be entitled to a prize from those donated to the fundraiser. An individual prize awarded to each winner shall not exceed a cash value of five hundred dollars ($500). For each event, the total cash value of prizes awarded shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(d) At least 90 percent of the gross revenue from the fundraiser shall go directly to a nonprofit organization. Compensation shall not be paid from revenues required to go directly to the nonprofit organization for the benefit of which the fundraiser is conducted, and no more than 10 percent of the gross receipts of a fundraiser may be paid as compensation to the entity or persons conducting the fundraiser for the nonprofit organization. If an eligible nonprofit organization does not own a facility in which to conduct a fundraiser and is required to pay the entity or person conducting the fundraiser a rental fee for the facility, the fair market rental value of the facility shall not be included when determining the compensation payable to the entity or person for purposes of this section. This section does not preclude an eligible organization from using funds from sources other than the gross revenue of the fundraiser to pay for the administration or other costs of conducting the fundraiser.

(e) An eligible nonprofit organization shall not conduct a fundraiser authorized by this section, unless it has been in existence and operation for at least three years and registers annually with the department. The department shall furnish a registration form on its Internet Web site or, upon request, to eligible nonprofit organizations. The department shall, by regulation, collect only the information necessary pursuant to this section on this form. This information shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

(1) The name and address of the eligible organization.

(2) The federal tax identification number, the corporate number issued by the Secretary of State, the organization number issued by the Franchise Tax Board, or the California charitable trust identification number of the eligible organization.

(3) The name and title of a responsible fiduciary of the organization.

(f) The department shall adopt regulations necessary to effectuate this section, including emergency regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) The nonprofit organization shall maintain records for each fundraiser using controlled games, which shall include:

(1) An itemized list of gross receipts for the fundraiser.

(2) An itemized list of recipients of the net profit of the fundraiser, including the name, address, and purpose for which fundraiser proceeds are to be used.

(3) The number of persons who participated in the fundraiser.

(4) An itemized list of the direct cost incurred for each fundraiser.

(5) A list of all prizes awarded during each fundraiser.

(6) The date, hours, and location for each fundraiser held.

(h) As used in this article, “nonprofit organization” means an organization that has been qualified to conduct business in California for at least three years prior to conducting controlled games and is exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 23701a, 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, 23701k, 23701l, or 23701w of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(i) The department may take legal action against a registrant if it determines that the registrant has violated this section or any regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or that the registrant has engaged in any conduct that is not in the best interest of the public’s health, safety, or general welfare. Any action taken pursuant to this subdivision does not prohibit the commencement of an administrative or criminal action by the Attorney General, a district attorney, or county counsel.

(j) The department may require an eligible organization to pay an annual registration fee of up to one hundred dollars ($100) per year to cover the actual costs of the department to administer and enforce this section. The annual registration fees shall be deposited by the department into the Gambling Control Fund.

(k) No fundraiser permitted under this section may be conducted by means of, or otherwise utilize, any gaming machine, apparatus, or device that meets the definition of a slot machine contained in Section 330b or 330.1 of the Penal Code.

(l) No more than four fundraisers at the same location, even if sponsored by different nonprofit organizations, shall be permitted in any calendar year, except in rural areas where preapproved by the department. For purposes of this section, “rural” shall mean any county with an urban influence code, as established by the latest publication of the Economic Research Service of the United States Department of Agriculture, of “3” or more.

(m) The authority to conduct a fundraiser, as well as the type of controlled games, may be governed by local ordinance.

(n) No person shall be permitted to participate in the fundraiser unless that person is at least 21 years of age.

(o) No fundraiser permitted under this section may be operated or conducted over the Internet.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 49.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

19987.

(a) The department, by regulation or order, may require any person or entity set forth in subdivision (b), to register with the department.

(b) “Person or entity” means one who, directly or indirectly, manufactures, distributes, supplies, vends, leases, or otherwise provides, supplies, devices, or other equipment designed for use in the playing of controlled games by any nonprofit organization registered to conduct controlled games.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 176, Sec. 50.   Effective August 24, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5.5. Franchise Relations [20000. - 20044.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [20000. - 20010.]

20000.

This chapter shall be known and may be referred to as the California Franchise Relations Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20001.

As used in this chapter, “franchise” means a contract or agreement, either expressed or implied, whether oral or written, between two or more persons by which:

(a) A franchisee is granted the right to engage in the business of offering, selling or distributing goods or services under a marketing plan or system prescribed in substantial part by a franchisor; and

(b) The operation of the franchisee’s business pursuant to that plan or system is substantially associated with the franchisor’s trademark, service mark, trade name, logotype, advertising, or other commercial symbol designating the franchisor or its affiliate; and

(c) The franchisee is required to pay, directly or indirectly, a franchise fee.

(d) “Franchise” does not include any of the following:

(1) Any franchise governed by the Petroleum Marketing Practices Act (P.L. 95-297).

(2) Lease departments, licenses, or concessions at or with a general merchandise retail establishment where the lease department, licensee, or concessionaire is incidental and ancillary to the general commercial operation of the retail establishment. Sales of a leased department, license, or concessionaire are incidental and ancillary to the general commercial operation of the retail establishment if they amount to less than 10 percent of the establishment’s sales.

(3) A nonprofit organization operated on a cooperative basis by and for independent retailers which wholesales goods and services primarily to its member retailers and in which all of the following is applicable:

(A) Control and ownership of each member is substantially equal.

(B) Membership is limited to those who will use the services furnished by the organization.

(C) Transfer of ownership is prohibited or limited.

(D) Capital investment receives no return.

(E) Substantially equal benefits pass to the members on the basis of patronage of the organization.

(F) Members are not personally liable for obligations of the organization in the absence of a direct undertaking or authorization by them.

(G) Services of the organization are furnished primarily for the use of the members.

(H) Each member and prospective member is provided with an offering circular which complies with the specifications of Section 31111 of the Corporations Code. 

(I) No part of the receipts, income, or profit of the organization are paid to any profitmaking entity, except for arms-length payments for necessary goods and services and members are not required to purchase goods or services from any designated profitmaking entity.

(J) The nonprofit organization is subject to an action for rescission or damages under Section 3343.7 of the Civil Code if the organization fraudulently induced the plaintiff to join the organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1380, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

20002.

A “franchisee” is a person to whom a franchise is granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20003.

A “franchisor” is a person who grants or has granted a franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20004.

“Area franchise” means any contract or agreement between a franchisor and a subfranchisor whereby the subfranchisor is granted the right, for consideration given in whole or in part for such right, to sell or negotiate the sale of franchises in the name or on behalf of the franchisor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20005.

A “subfranchisor” is a person to whom an area franchise is granted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20006.

“Franchise” includes “area franchise.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------

20007.

“Franchise fee” means any fee or charge that a franchisee or subfranchisor is required to pay or agrees to pay for the right to enter into a business under a franchise agreement, including, but not limited to, any payment for goods and services.

However, the following shall not be considered the payment of a franchise fee:

(a) The purchase or agreement to purchase goods at a bona fide wholesale price if no obligation is imposed upon the purchaser to purchase or pay for a quantity of goods in excess of that which a reasonable businessperson normally would purchase by way of a starting inventory or supply or to maintain a going inventory or supply.

(b) The payment of a reasonable service charge to the issuer of a credit card by an establishment accepting or honoring that credit card.

(c) Amounts paid to a trading stamp company under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 17750) of Part 3 of Division 7 by a person issuing trading stamps in connection with the retail sale of merchandise or service.

(d) The payment, directly or indirectly, of a franchise fee which, on an annual basis, does not exceed the sum of one hundred dollars ($100).

(e) The payment of a sum of not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) annually on account of the purchase price or rental of fixtures, equipment, or other tangible property to be utilized in, and necessary for, the operation of the franchised business, if the price or rental so charged does not exceed the cost which would be incurred by the franchisee acquiring the item or items from other persons or in the open market.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20008.

“Person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, a limited liability company, a joint venture, an association, a joint stock company, a trust or an unincorporated organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

20009.

The regulations, releases, guidelines, and interpretive opinions of the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under the Franchise Investment Law (Division 5 (commencing with Section 31000) of Title 4 of the Corporations Code) regarding whether or not an agreement constitutes a “franchise” within the meaning of that law shall be prima facie evidence of the scope and extent of coverage of the definition of “franchise” under this chapter; provided, however, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 17.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

20010.

Any condition, stipulation or provision purporting to bind any person to waive compliance with any provision of this law is contrary to public policy and void.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1355, Sec. 1.   Effective October 1, 1980.   Operative January 1, 1981, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 1355.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Jurisdiction [20015. - 20015.]

20015.

(a) The provisions of this chapter apply to any franchise when either the franchisee is domiciled in this state or the franchised business is or has been operated in this state.

(b) Any provision of a franchise agreement requiring the franchisee to waive the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be void and unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Termination [20020. - 20022.]

20020.

Except as otherwise provided by this chapter, no franchisor may terminate a franchise prior to the expiration of its term, except for good cause. Except as provided in Section 20021, good cause shall be limited to the failure of the franchisee to substantially comply with the lawful requirements imposed upon the franchisee by the franchise agreement after being given notice at least 60 days in advance of the termination and a reasonable opportunity, which in no event shall be less than 60 days from the date of the notice of noncompliance, to cure the failure. The period to exercise the right to cure shall not exceed 75 days unless there is a separate agreement between the franchisor and franchisee to extend the time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20021.

If during the period in which the franchise is in effect, there occurs any of the following events which is relevant to the franchise, immediate notice of termination without an opportunity to cure, shall be deemed reasonable:

(a) The franchisee or the business to which the franchise relates has been the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy, judicially determined to be insolvent, all or a substantial part of the assets thereof are assigned to or for the benefit of any creditor, or the franchisee admits his or her inability to pay his or her debts as they come due;

(b) The franchisee abandons the franchise by failing to operate the business for five consecutive days during
 which the franchisee is required to operate the business under the terms of the franchise, or any shorter period after which it is not unreasonable under the facts and circumstances for the franchisor to conclude that the franchisee does not intend to continue to operate the franchise, unless such failure to operate is due to fire, flood, earthquake, or other similar causes beyond the franchisee’s control;

(c) The franchisor and franchisee agree in writing to terminate the franchise;

(d) The franchisee makes any material misrepresentations relating to the acquisition of the franchise business or the franchisee engages in conduct which reflects materially and unfavorably upon the operation and reputation of the franchise business or system;

(e) The franchisee fails, for a period of 10 days after notification of
 noncompliance, to comply with any federal, state, or local law or regulation, including, but not limited to, all health, safety, building, and labor laws or regulations applicable to the operation of the franchise;

(f) The franchisee, after curing any failure in accordance with Section 20020 engages in the same noncompliance whether or not such noncompliance is corrected after notice;

(g) The franchisee repeatedly fails to comply with one or more requirements of the franchise, whether or not corrected after notice;

(h) The franchised business or business premises of the franchise are seized, taken over, or foreclosed by a government official in the exercise of his or her duties, or seized, taken over, or foreclosed by a creditor, lienholder, or lessor, provided that a final judgment against the franchisee remains
 unsatisfied for 30 days (unless a supersedeas or other appeal bond has been filed); or a levy of execution has been made upon the license granted by the franchise agreement or upon any property used in the franchised business, and it is not discharged within five days of such levy;

(i) The franchisee is convicted of a felony or any other criminal misconduct which is relevant to the operation of the franchise;

(j) The franchisee fails to pay any franchise fees or other amounts due to the franchisor or its affiliate within five days after receiving written notice that such fees are overdue; or

(k) The franchisor makes a reasonable determination that continued operation of the franchise by the franchisee will result in an imminent danger to public health or safety.

(l) If the franchise expressly permits termination under such circumstances, there is a lawful termination or nonrenewal of a separate motor fuel franchise governed by provisions of the Petroleum Marketing Practices Act (15 U.S.C. Secs. 2801 to 2807, inclusive) that is operated by the franchisee or affiliate of the franchisee located at the same business premises if both franchises are granted by the same franchisor or an affiliate of the franchisor. “Affiliate” shall have the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (k) of Section 31005.5 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 776, Sec. 2.   (AB 525)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

20022.

(a) Except as provided in this section, upon a lawful termination or nonrenewal of a franchisee, the franchisor shall purchase from the franchisee, at the value of price paid, minus depreciation, all inventory, supplies, equipment, fixtures, and furnishings purchased or paid for under the terms of the franchise agreement or any ancillary or collateral agreement by the franchisee to the franchisor or its approved suppliers and sources, that are, at the time of the notice of termination or nonrenewal, in the possession of the franchisee or used by the franchisee in the franchise business. The franchisor shall have the right to receive clear title to and possession of all items purchased from the franchisee under this section.

(b) This section shall not require the
 franchisor to purchase any personalized items, inventory, supplies, equipment, fixtures, or furnishings not reasonably required to conduct the operation of the franchise business in accordance with the franchise agreement or any ancillary or collateral agreement or to which the franchisee, at the cessation of operation of the franchise business by the franchisee, cannot lawfully, or does not, grant the franchisor clear title and possession upon the franchisor’s payment to the franchisee for the inventory, supplies, equipment, fixtures, or furnishings.

(c) This section shall not apply when the franchisee declines a bona fide offer of renewal from the franchisor.

(d) This section shall not apply if the franchisor does not prevent the franchisee from retaining control of the principal place of the franchise business.

(e) This section shall not apply to any termination or nonrenewal of a franchise due to a publicly announced and nondiscriminatory decision by the franchisor to completely withdraw from all franchise activity within the relevant geographic market area in which the franchise is located. For the purpose of this section “relevant geographic market area” shall have the same meaning as in Section 20999.

(f) This section shall not apply if the franchisor and franchisee mutually agree in writing to terminate or not renew the franchise.

(g) This section shall not apply to any inventory, supplies, equipment, fixtures, or furnishings that are sold by the franchisee between the date of the notice of termination or nonrenewal, and the cessation of operation of the franchise business, by the franchisee, pursuant to the termination or nonrenewal.

(h) Upon the termination or nonrenewal of a franchise, a franchisor may offset against the amounts owed to a franchisee under this section any amounts owed by the franchisee to the franchisor, provided the franchisee agrees to the amount owed or the franchisor has received a final adjudication of any amounts owed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 728, Sec. 2.   (AB 676)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Nonrenewal [20025. - 20026.]

20025.

No franchisor may fail to renew a franchise unless such franchisor provides the franchisee at least 180 days prior written notice of its intention not to renew; and

(a) During the 180 days prior to expiration of the franchise the franchisor permits the franchisee to sell his business to a purchaser meeting the franchisor’s then current requirements for granting new franchises, or if the franchisor is not granting a significant number of new franchises, the then current requirements for granting renewal franchises; or

(b) (1) The refusal to renew is not for the purpose of converting the franchisee’s business premises to operation by employees or agents of the franchisor for such franchisor’s own account, provided, that nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit a franchisor from exercising a right of first refusal to purchase the franchisee’s business; and

(2) Upon expiration of the franchise, the franchisor agrees not to seek to enforce any covenant of the nonrenewed franchisee not to compete with the franchisor or franchisees of the franchisor; or

(c) Termination would be permitted pursuant to Section 20020 or 20021; or

(d) The franchisee and the franchisor agree not to renew the franchise; or

(e) The franchisor withdraws from distributing its products or services through franchises in the geographic market served by the franchisee, provided that: 

(1) Upon expiration of the franchise, the franchisor agrees not to seek to enforce any covenant of the nonrenewed franchisee not to compete with the franchisor or franchisees of the franchisor; and

(2) The failure to renew is not for the purpose of converting the business conducted by the franchisee pursuant to the franchise agreement to operation by employees or agents of the franchisor for such franchisor’s own account; and

(3) Where the franchisor determines to sell, transfer, or assign its interest in a marketing premises occupied by a franchisee whose franchise agreement is not renewed pursuant to this paragraph:

(A) The franchisor, during the 180-day period after giving notice offers such franchisee a right of first refusal of at least 30 days’ duration of a bona fide offer, made by another to purchase such franchisor’s interest in such premises; or

(B) In the case of the sale, transfer, or assignment to another person of the franchisor’s interest in one or more other controlled marketing premises, such other person in good faith offers the franchisee a franchise on substantially the same terms and conditions currently being offered by such other person to other franchisees; or
